Illinois, session 104th, SB544.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Transportation Funding Protection Act is 5amended by changing Section 5-1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 178/5-1)7    Sec. 5-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the the 8Transportation Funding Protection Act. References in this 9Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 101-32, eff. 6-28-19.)